utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.aff
# Latgalīšu pareizraksteibys pōrbaudis moduļs lītošanai ar LibreOffice,
# OpenOffice 3.3.x i vairuok, Mozilla u.c. produktim
# Latgalian affix table for LibreOffice, OpenOffice 3.3.x and greater, Mozilla etc software
# employing Hunspell as spellchecking engine
#
# Copyright (C) 2010-2014 Janis Eisaks, jancs@dv.lv
#
# Version info: 0.1.5
#
# This library is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# This library is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this library; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA 02111-1307 USA
#
# Moduļa radeišonai izmontuotuo literatura:
# 1. Juris Cibuļs, Lidija Leikuma,
#    VASALS! Latgaliešu valodas mācība, izdevnīceiba n.i.m.s, 2003, ISBN9984-679-88-8
#
# 2. 2007.gada 27.septembra Valsts valodas centra Latviešu valodas ekspertu komisijas
#    Latgaliešu ortogrāfijas apakškomisijas lēmums Nr.1, "Latgaliešu rakstības noteikumi"
#
# Formats: Hunspell
#
# Here's a part of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
#
#        _+-=1234567890ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Used:  ----------------------------------------
#             !@$%^&*()abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
# Used:                --------------------------

SET UTF-8
TRY ianseātyōumpojšrkdīzlēvbgcķūņļčžfģhASMVLDIKERBGJZTNPHUOFCĀĶŽĒŌĢŠĪŪYČŅĻ

#Hunspell searches and suggests words with one different character replaced by a neighbor KEY character.
# Not neighbor characters in KEY string separated by vertical line characters.
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm

#NOSUGGEST flag

#ļaun likvidēt vysu vuordu
FULLSTRIP

PFX - Y 1
PFX -  0  na .

SFX = Y 1
SFX = 0 . .

REP 2
REP ō uo
REP jebkur sevkur
#2.5.8.1.2. ___Paguotnis___ aktivajim lūkomajim divdabim vīnskaitļa nominativā ir golūtne
#  -s un izskanis -use, -ušais, -ušuo: peļnejs, peļnejuse, peļnejušais, peļnejušuo.
# Dvdabim, kuri atvasynuoti nu darbeibys vuordu ar -eit nanūteiksmē, golūtnis voi izskanis prīškā
#  roksta -ej- (lasejs, lasejuse, lasejušais, lasejušuo).
# Divdabim, kuri atvasynuoti nu darbeibys vuordu ar -ēt nanūteiksmē, golūtnis voi izskanis prīškā
#  roksta -iej- (pīredziejs, pīredziejuse, pīredziejušais, pīredziejušuo).
#2.5.8.2.2. ____Paguotnis____ pasivajim lūkomajim divdabim ir izskanis:
# -ts, -ta, -tais, -tuo (dūts, dūta, dūtais, dūtuo).
#     Ka darbeibys vuordam, nu kura atvasynuots divdabs, paguotnē golūtnis prīškā ir z (lauze),
#         paguotnis pasivajim lūkomajim divdabu izskanis -ts, -ta prīškā roksta     z (lauzts);
#     ka darbeibys vuordam paguotnē ir s, d, t (plēse, gryude, syta), izskanis -ts, -ta prīškā
#         roksta     s (plāsts, gryusts, systs).

#Paguotnis aktivī lūkomī divdabi II konj. 2. gr., -s un izskanis -use, -ušais, -ušuo
#Paguotnis pasivī lūkomī divdabi II konj. 2. gr., -ts, -ta, -tais, -tuo
############################
#taisets nu SFX K
#SFX 6 Y 2
#SFX 6 it iejs/9 eit  #pesteit, miereit
#SFX 6 it its/W   eit
#
SFX 6 Y 2
SFX 6 eit iejs/9  eit
SFX 6  it  its/W  eit


#Paguotnis aktivī lūkomī divdabi II konj. 2. gr., -s un izskanis -use, -ušais, -ušuo
#Paguotnis pasivī lūkomī divdabi II konj. 2. gr., -ts, -ta, -tais, -tuo
#taisets nu SFX L
#2012-12-08
SFX 7 Y 60
SFX 7 t   js/9 [^ēgiīkļmrsuū]t  #runuot
SFX 7 t   ts/W [^ēgiīkļmrsuū]t  #runuot
SFX 7 ēt  iejs/9    [ē]t      #audzēt, meklēt, dēt
SFX 7 ēt  iets/W  [^d]ēt      #audzēt, meklēt
SFX 7 ēt  āts/W    [d]ēt      #dēt - atstarožņai - moža kū stypri samaitoi!!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 eit ejs/9      eit      #neit, itml izaver pec III konj lūcejuma, tai ka IIk itymā afiksā navar tikt
SFX 7 0   s/W        eit      #neit
SFX 7 īt  iejs/9      īt      #rīt - riejs - riejuse
SFX 7 0   s/W         īt      #rīt
SFX 7 umt yums/9     umt      #stumt - styums - styumuse
SFX 7 0   s/W        umt      #stumt - stumts
SFX 7 ūrt yurs/9     ūrt      #dūrt - dyurs - dyuruse
SFX 7 0   s/W        ūrt      #dūrt - dūrts
SFX 7 ut  vs/9    [^a]ut      #giut - givs - givuse
SFX 7 0   s/W     [^a]ut      #giut - giuts
SFX 7 aut uovs/9     aut      #saut - suovs - suovuse
SFX 7 0   s/W        aut      #saut
SFX 7 gt  dzs/9  [^ēi]gt      #klīgt-klīdzs // augt-audzs
SFX 7 0   s/W    [^ēie]gt      #klīgt - klīgts
SFX 7 egt agts/W     egt      #segt-sagts
SFX 7 ēgt iedzs/9  [ē]gt      #bēgt - biedzs - bāguse !!!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 ēgt āgts/W   [ē]gt      #bēgt - bāgts
SFX 7 igt idzs/9   [i]gt      #migt - midzs - myguse!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 igt ygts/W   [i]gt      #migt - mygts
SFX 7 kt  cs/9    [^ēiļr]kt   #saukt - saucs - saukuse !!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 0   s/W     [^ēiļr]kt   #saukt - saukts
SFX 7 ēkt iecs/9     [ē]kt    #lēkt - liecs - lākuse !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 ēkt ākts/W     [ē]kt    #lēkt - lākts
SFX 7 ikt ics/9      [i]kt  is:1vptx0 #likt - lics - lykuse !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 ikt ykts/W     [i]kt    #likt - lykts
SFX 7 iļkt iļcs/9     iļkt    #viļkt - viļcs - vylkuse !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 iļkt ylkts/W    iļkt    #viļkt - vylkts
SFX 7 arkt arcs/9     arkt    #sarkt - sarcs - sorkuse !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 arkt orkts/W    arkt    #sarkt - sorkts
SFX 7 aļt aļs/9        aļt    #maļt-maļs-molts
SFX 7 aļt olts/W       aļt    #maļt
SFX 7 eļt ieļs/9       eļt    #ceļt - cieļs - calts//cāluse//smeļt
SFX 7 eļt alts/W       eļt    #ceļt
SFX 7 imt ims/9        imt    #dzimt - dzims - dzymuse !!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 imt ymts/W       imt    #dzimt - dzymts
SFX 7 ert iers/9       ert    #dzert - dziers - dzāruse !!!!!!!!
SFX 7 ert arts/W       ert    #dzert - dzarts
SFX 7 ērt iers/9       ērt    #pērt - piers - pāruse !!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 ērt ārts/W       ērt    #pērt - pārts
SFX 7 t   s/9          irt    #virt - virs
SFX 7 irt yrts/W       irt    #virt - vyrts
SFX 7 st  ds/9   [^aeiu]st    #svīst - svīds - svīduse
SFX 7 0   s/W    [^aeiu]st    #svīst-svīsts
SFX 7 ast ats/9        ast    #prast - prats - protuse !!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 ast osts/W       ast    #prast - prosts
SFX 7 st  ds/9      [e]ist    #zeist - zeids - zeiduse
SFX 7 0   s/W       [e]ist    #zeist
SFX 7 ist ids/9    [^e]ist    #brist-brids-bryduse !!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 ist ysts/W   [^e]ist    #brist - brysts
SFX 7 est eds/9        est    #vest - veds - vaduse !!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 est asts/W       est    #vest - vasts
SFX 7 st  ts/9         ust    #pyust-pyuts
SFX 7 ust sts/W        ust    #pyust-pyusts
SFX 7 ūt  evs/9    ūt  #dūt - devs - davuse !!!!!!!!!!!!!!
SFX 7 0   s/W      ūt  #dūt - dūts


#Paguotnis aktivī lūkomī divdabi -s un izskanis -use, -ušais, -ušuo
#Paguotnis pasivī lūkomī divdabi -ts, -ta, -tais, -tuo
#pagutne, specgadejumi
#taisets nu SFX M
#2010-08-22
#2010-09-27
#2012-12-08
#juodlīk meit (zyrgus), slēgt (lūka na tai kai bēgt)
SFX 8 Y 19
SFX 8 t   s/9  [^impsu]t    #stīpt -stīpt-stīpi
SFX 8 0   s/W    [^psu]t    #stīpt -stīpt-stīpi
SFX 8 t   s/9     [^e]pt    #stīpt -stīpt-stīpi
SFX 8 0   s/W     [^e]pt    #stīpt -stīpt-stīpi
SFX 8 t   s/9        ept    #cept - ceps
SFX 8 ept apts/W     ept    #cept - capts
SFX 8 imt iems/9   [i]mt    #jimt
SFX 8 st  ts/9   [^ie]st    #pyust pyuts
SFX 8 0   s/W   [^aie]st    #pyust pyusts
SFX 8 ast osts/W     ast    #prasts - prosts
SFX 8 est asts/W  [mn]est    #mest-masts, nest-nasts
SFX 8 est ess/9    [n]est    #nest-ness
SFX 8 est ets/9    [m]est    #mest-mets
SFX 8 ist its/9  [^e]ist    #krist - krits
SFX 8 ist ysts/W [^e]ist    #krist - krysts
SFX 8 t   s/9     [e]ist    #pleist - pleiss
SFX 8 eist āsts/W [e]ist    #pleist - plāsts
SFX 8 yut ejs/9      yut    #byut
SFX 8 eit ins/9  [^n]eit   #dzeit, meit (pedaļus)     #!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
