utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
aizaizvakar/= po:apstv
aizdzeit/0FLN17-
aizdzeit/0GMN28-
aizgulēt/ILN470-
aizkleivuot/HLN370-
aizklīgt/0HLN38-
aizmyrguot/HLN370-
aizmīgt/0HLN38-
aizskaiteit/ILN470-
aizspruogt/0FMN18-
aizšmaukt/0HLN38-
aizvakar/= po:apstv
apbyzuot/HLN37-
apbrist/0HLN37-
apbruozt/0HMN38-
apguoduot/HLN370-
apknuobuot/HLN37-
apleik/= po:apstv
aplīkt/0HLN38-
apmeideit/ILN470-
apmiereit/HKN360-
apraksteit/ILN47-
apskaiteit/ILN470-
apsuoleit/HKN360-
apšyut/0FLN17-
apšmaukt/0HLN38-
apteireit/HKN360-
apūšņuot/HLN370-
apzeļteit/HKN360-
atcept/0HMN38-
atcyluot/HLN370-
atdaleit/ILN470-
atkiukuot/HLN370-
atkruokt/0HLN38-
atkuosēt/HLN370-
atmedeit/HKN360-
atmyrguot/HLN370-
atpeļneit/HKN360-
atrast/0HMN38-
atrunuot/HLN370-
atsegt/0HLN37-
atsuoleit/HKN360-
atšļyukt/0HLN38-
attaiseit/ILN470-
attaisnuot/HLN370-
atzibsneit/HKN360-
au/= po:izsv
bez/= po:prīv
bēgt/HKN37-
bravo/= po:izsv
bruozt/HMN38-
buļ/= po:izsv
ceļuot/HLNhln37-
cik/= po:apstv
cīši/= po:apstv
dabuot/HLNhln37-
dakaitavuot/HLN370-
dakrist/0HNM38-
dakuosēt/HLN370-
damiereit/HKN360-
daraut/0FLN17-
darynuot/HLN37-
dastīpt/0GMN28-
dasuoleit/HKN360-
datierguot/HLN370-
datyvynuot/HLN370-
daudz/=+ po:apstv
dyžan/= po:apstv
dreiži/= po:apstv
dzeivuot/HLNhln37-
dzie/= po:izsv
edzi/= po:izsv
eu/= po:izsv
gataveit/HKNhkn36-
gavēt/HLNhln37-
gluobt/GMN28-
ilgi/= po:apstv
izasorguot/HLN37-
izdyukt/0HLN38-
izdrukuot/HLN370-
izdzīdynuot/HLN370-
izkūpt/0GMN28-
izkvālynuot/HLN370-
izlaupeit/ILN470-
izlīleit/HKN360-
izmiereit/HKN360-
izpesteit/HKN360-
izpyust/0GMN27-
izrypynuot/HLN370-
izsist/0HMN38-
izsmaļsteit/ILN470-
iztāluot/HLN370-
izteireit/HKN360-
iztrīkt/0HLN38-
izveiduot/HLN370-
īdabuot/HLN370-
īdadzynuot/HLN370-
īdzeit/0GMN28-
īgataveit/HKN360-
īkaukt/0HLN38-
īkruot/0GLN27-
īkvīkt/0HLN38-
īmērcēt/HLN370-
īmiereit/HKN360-
īreikuot/HLN370-
īryukt/0HLN38-
īsēdēt/ILN470-
īsuoleit/HKN360-
īškatynuot/HLN370-
īteit/0HMN18-
īvieteit/HKN360-
jau/= po:apstv
ka/= po:saiklis
kleikuot/HLNhln37-
knuobt/GMN28-
koč/= po:saiklis
kotrureiz/= po:apstv
kur/= po:apstv
kustynuot/HLNhln37-
lai/= po:saiklis
liduot/HLNhln37-
līleit/HKNhkn36-
miereit/HKNhkn36-
mierkt/FMN18-
mīrynuot/HLNhln37-
moz/= po:apstv
na/= po:saiklis
nazkur/= po:apstv
neit/GLN27-
nikur/= po:apstv
nui/= po:part
nūdaudzynuot/HLN370-
nūecēt/HLN370-
nūgataveit/HKN360-
nūgrīzt/0HMN38-
nūlīgt/0HLN38-
nūlīt/0HLN27-
nūmauruot/HLN370-
nūmedeit/HKN360-
nūmīreit/HKN360-
nūpieteit/HKN360-
nūruodeit/ILN470-
nūsist/0HMN38-
nūstuot/0GLN27-
nūsvieteit/HKN360-
nūškaļdeit/ILN470-
nūteit/0HMN18-
nūvieteit/HKN360-
nūzibsneit/HKN360-
oi/= po:izsv
pabraukalēt/HLN370-
pabuozt/0HMN38-
pačatuot/HLN370-
pagolam/= po:apstv
pagūdynuot/HLN37-
paknuobt/0GMN28-
palīleit/HKN360-
paluodēt/ILN470-
paļdis/= po:izsv
pameiļuot/HLN370-
pamiereit/HKN360-
papeit/0HMN18-
papieteit/HKN360-
paprīšku/= po:apstv
pasēdēt/ILN470-
pastaiguot/HLN370-
pasvieteit/HKN360-
patīsuot/HLN370-
pat/= po:part
patrīkt/0HLN38-
pavieteit/HKN360-
peļneit/HKNhkn36-
pē/= po:izsv
pieteit/HKNhkn36-
pi/= po:prīv
pībuozt/0HMN38-
pībūzt/0HMN38-
pīdaudzynuot/HLN370-
pīklīgt/0HLN38-
pīktdiņ/= po:apstv
pīluodēt/ILN470-
pīmedeit/HKN360-
pīmigt/0HLN37-
pīmīgt/0HLN38-
pīpeļneit/HKN360-
pīskaiteit/ILN470-
pīteireit/HKN360-
pīteit/0HMN18-
pīveļt/0GLN27-
pīzīdynuot/HLN370-
prīškā/= po:apstv
puordūrt/0HLN38-
puorgataveit/HKN360-
puorkaltēt/HLN370-
puorlauzt/0HMN38-
puorlīkt/0HLN38-
puormiereit/HKN360-
puorrypynuot/HLN370-
puoršļyukt/0HLN38-
puorteireit/HKN360-
puortikt/0HLN37-
puorturēt/ILN470-
riksim/= po:apstv
saberzt/0HMN38-
sabraukalēt/HLN370-
sadruozt/0HMN38-
sagataveit/HKN360-
sagrebt/0GMN28-
saguoduot/HLN370-
salauzt/0HMN38-
samaluot/HLN370-
samedeit/HKN360-
samīreit/HKN360-
sarast/0HMN38-
sasaprīcuot/HLN37-
saspieļuot/HLN370-
sastdiņ/= po:apstv
sastīpt/0GMN28-
sasuoleit/HKN360-
sašvacynuot/HLN370-
saūrbt/0GMN28-
sazibsneit/HKN360-
skanēt/ILNiln47-
sliduot/HLNhln37-
spīgt/HLN38-
sūpluok/= po:apstv
svieteit/HKNhkn36-
šļop/= po:izsv
šūreit/= po:apstv
tak/= po:part
tyvi/= po:apstv
tuļzt/HMN38-
tuoli/= po:apstv
tuolynuot/HLNhln37-
tūnedeļ/= po:apstv
tūzīm/= po:apstv
varbyut/= po:part
vieteit/HKNhkn36-
vysleidza/= po:part
voi/= po:saiklis
